California statutes. Penal Code
The court, upon allowing sentences to be served on weekends or other nonemployment days, shall conduct a hearing to determine if the defendant has the ability to pay all or a part of the costs of administration without resulting in unnecessary economic hardship to the defendant and his or her dependents. At the hearing, the defendant shall be entitled to have, but shall not be limited to, the opportunity to be heard in person, to present witnesses and other documentary evidence, and to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses, and to disclosure of the evidence against the defendant, and a written statement of the findings of the court. If the court determines that the defendant has the ability to pay all or part of the costs of administration without resulting in unnecessary economic hardship to the defendant and his or her dependents, the court shall advise the defendant of the provisions of this section and order him or her to pay all or part of the fee as required by the sheriff, probation officer, or Director of the County Department of Corrections, whichever the case may be. In making a determination of whether a defendant has the ability to pay, the court shall take into account the amount of any fine imposed upon the defendant and any amount the defendant has been ordered to pay in restitution.

As used in this section, the term “ability to pay” means the overall capability of the defendant to reimburse the costs, or a portion of the costs, and shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(a) The defendant’s present financial position.

(b) The defendant’s reasonably discernible future financial position. In no event shall the court consider a period of more than six months from the date of the hearing for purposes of determining reasonably discernible future financial position.

(c) Likelihood that the defendant shall be able to obtain employment within the six-month period from the date of the hearing.

(d) Any other factor or factors which may bear upon the defendant’s financial capability to reimburse the county for the costs.

Execution may be issued on the order in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action.

The order to pay all or part shall not be enforced by contempt. At any time during the pendency of the judgment, a defendant against whom a judgment has been rendered may petition the rendering court to modify or vacate its previous judgment on the grounds of a change of circumstances with regard to the defendant’s ability to pay the judgment. The court shall advise the defendant of this right at the time of making the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 779, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1209.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the court shall permit a person convicted of an infraction, upon a showing that payment of the total fine would pose a hardship on the defendant or the defendant’s family, to elect to perform community service in lieu of the total fine that would otherwise be imposed.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “total fine” means the total bail, including the base fine and all assessments, penalties, and additional moneys to be paid by the defendant.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, the hourly rate applicable to community service performed pursuant to this section shall be double
 the minimum wage set for the applicable calendar year, based on the schedule for an employer who employs 25 or fewer employees, as established in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a court may by local rule increase the amount that is credited for each hour of community service performed pursuant to this section, to exceed the hourly rate described in paragraph (1).

(d) (1) If the court determines that a person who has been convicted of an infraction has shown that payment of the total fine would pose a hardship pursuant to subdivision (a) and the person has elected to perform community service in lieu of paying the total fine, the person may elect to perform that community service in the
 county in which the infraction violation occurred, the county of the person’s residence, or any other county to which the person has substantial ties, including, but not limited to, employment, family, or education ties.

(2) Regardless of the county in which the person elects to perform community service pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall retain jurisdiction until the community service has been verified as complete.

(e) (1) If the court determines that a person who has been convicted of an infraction has shown that payment of the total fine would pose a hardship pursuant to subdivision (a) and the person has elected to perform community service in lieu of
 paying the total fine pursuant to subdivision (d), the court may, in its discretion, permit a person to participate in an educational program to satisfy community service hours.

(2) As used in this subdivision, an educational program includes, but is not limited to, high school or General Education Development classes, college courses, adult literacy or English as a second language programs, and vocational education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 598, Sec. 1.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.

As used in Sections 1210.1 and 3063.1 of this code, and Division 10.8 (commencing with Section 11999.4) of the Health and Safety Code, the following definitions apply:

(a) The term “nonviolent drug possession offense” means the unlawful personal use, possession for personal use, or transportation for personal use of any controlled substance identified in Section 11054, 11055, 11056, 11057, or 11058 of the Health and Safety Code, or the offense of being under the influence of a controlled substance in violation of Section 11550 of the Health and Safety Code. The term “nonviolent drug possession offense” does not include the possession for sale, production, or
 manufacturing of any controlled substance and does not include violations of Section 4573.6 or 4573.8.

(b) The term “drug treatment program” or “drug treatment” means a state licensed or certified community drug treatment program, which may include one or more of the following: drug education, outpatient services, narcotic replacement therapy, residential treatment, detoxification services, and aftercare services. The term “drug treatment program” or “drug treatment” includes a drug treatment program operated under the direction of the Veterans Health Administration of the Department of Veterans Affairs or a program specified in Section 8001. That type of program shall be eligible to provide drug treatment services without regard to the licensing or certification provisions required by this subdivision. The term “drug treatment
 program” or “drug treatment” does not include drug treatment programs offered in a prison or jail facility.

(c) The term “successful completion of treatment” means that a defendant who has had drug treatment imposed as a condition of probation has completed the prescribed course of drug treatment as recommended by the treatment provider and ordered by the court. Completion of treatment shall not require cessation of narcotic replacement therapy.

(d) The term “misdemeanor not related to the use of drugs” means a misdemeanor that does not involve (1) the simple possession or use of drugs or drug paraphernalia, being present where drugs are used, or failure to register as a drug offender, or (2) any activity similar to those listed in (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 481, Sec. 2.   (SB 46)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided in subdivision (b), any person convicted of a nonviolent drug possession offense shall receive probation. As a condition of probation the court shall require participation in and completion of an appropriate drug treatment program. The court shall impose appropriate drug testing as a condition of probation. The court may also impose, as a condition of probation, participation in vocational training, family counseling, literacy training and/or community service. A court may not impose incarceration as an additional condition of probation. Aside from the limitations imposed in this subdivision, the trial court is not otherwise limited in the type of probation conditions it may
 impose. Probation shall be imposed by suspending the imposition of sentence. No person shall be denied the opportunity to benefit from the provisions of the Substance Abuse and Crime Prevention Act of 2000 based solely upon evidence of a co-occurring psychiatric or developmental disorder. To the greatest extent possible, any person who is convicted of, and placed on probation pursuant to this section for a nonviolent drug possession offense shall be monitored by the court through the use of a dedicated court calendar and the incorporation of a collaborative court model of oversight that includes close collaboration with treatment providers and probation, drug testing commensurate with treatment needs, and supervision of progress through review hearings.

In addition to any fine assessed under other provisions of law, the trial judge may require any person convicted of a nonviolent drug possession offense who is reasonably able to do so to contribute to the cost of
 his or her own placement in a drug treatment program.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any defendant who previously has been convicted of one or more violent or serious felonies as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 or subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, respectively, unless the nonviolent drug possession offense occurred after a period of five years in which the defendant remained free of both prison custody and the commission of an offense that results in a felony conviction other than a nonviolent drug possession offense, or a misdemeanor conviction involving physical injury or the threat of physical injury to another person.

(2) Any defendant who, in addition to one or more nonviolent drug possession offenses, has been convicted in the same proceeding of a misdemeanor not
 related to the use of drugs or any felony.

(3) Any defendant who, while armed with a deadly weapon, with the intent to use the same as a deadly weapon, unlawfully possesses or is under the influence of any controlled substance identified in Section 11054, 11055, 11056, 11057, or 11058 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Any defendant who refuses drug treatment as a condition of probation.

(5) Any defendant who has two separate convictions for nonviolent drug possession offenses, has participated in two separate courses of drug treatment pursuant to subdivision (a), and is found by the court, by clear and convincing evidence, to be unamenable to any and all forms of available drug treatment, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1210. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trial court shall sentence that
 defendant to 30 days in jail.

(c) (1) Any defendant who has previously been convicted of at least three non-drug-related felonies for which the defendant has served three separate prison terms within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 667.5 shall be presumed eligible for treatment under subdivision (a). The court may exclude the defendant from treatment under subdivision (a) where the court, pursuant to the motion of the prosecutor or its own motion, finds that the defendant poses a present danger to the safety of others and would not benefit from a drug treatment program. The court shall, on the record, state its findings, the reasons for those findings.

(2) Any defendant who has previously been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony at least five times within the prior 30 months shall be presumed to be eligible for treatment under subdivision (a). The
 court may exclude the defendant from treatment under subdivision (a) if the court, pursuant to the motion of the prosecutor, or on its own motion, finds that the defendant poses a present danger to the safety of others or would not benefit from a drug treatment program. The court shall, on the record, state its findings and the reasons for those findings.

(d) Within seven days of an order imposing probation under subdivision (a), the probation department shall notify the drug treatment provider designated to provide drug treatment under subdivision (a). Within 30 days of receiving that notice, the treatment provider shall prepare a treatment plan and forward it to the probation department for distribution to the court and counsel. The treatment provider shall provide to the probation department standardized treatment progress reports, with minimum data elements as determined by the department, including all drug testing results. At a minimum,
 the reports shall be provided to the court every 90 days, or more frequently, as the court directs.

(1) If at any point during the course of drug treatment the treatment provider notifies the probation department and the court that the defendant is unamenable to the drug treatment being provided, but may be amenable to other drug treatments or related programs, the probation department may move the court to modify the terms of probation, or on its own motion, the court may modify the terms of probation after a hearing to ensure that the defendant receives the alternative drug treatment or program.

(2) If at any point during the course of drug treatment the treatment provider notifies the probation department and the court that the defendant is unamenable to the drug treatment provided and all other forms of drug treatment programs pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1210, the
 probation department may move to revoke probation. At the revocation hearing, if it is proved that the defendant is unamenable to all drug treatment programs pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1210, the court may revoke probation.

(3) Drug treatment services provided by subdivision (a) as a required condition of probation may not exceed 12 months, unless the court makes a finding supported by the record, that the continuation of treatment services beyond 12 months is necessary for drug treatment to be successful. If that finding is made, the court may order up to two six-month extensions of treatment services. The provision of treatment services under the Substance Abuse and Crime Prevention Act of 2000 shall not exceed 24 months.

(e) (1) At any time after completion of drug treatment and the terms of probation, the court shall conduct a hearing, and if
 the court finds that the defendant successfully completed drug treatment, and substantially complied with the conditions of probation, including refraining from the use of drugs after the completion of treatment, the conviction on which the probation was based shall be set aside and the court shall dismiss the indictment, complaint, or information against the defendant. In addition, except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), both the arrest and the conviction shall be deemed never to have occurred. The defendant may additionally petition the court for a dismissal of charges at any time after completion of the prescribed course of drug treatment. Except as provided in paragraph (2) or (3), the defendant shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense of which he or she has been convicted.

(2) Dismissal of an indictment, complaint, or information pursuant to paragraph (1) does not permit a person to
 own, possess, or have in his or her custody or control any firearm capable of being concealed upon the person or prevent his or her conviction under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(3) Except as provided below, after an indictment, complaint, or information is dismissed pursuant to paragraph (1), the defendant may indicate in response to any question concerning his or her prior criminal record that he or she was not arrested or convicted for the offense. Except as provided below, a record pertaining to an arrest or conviction resulting in successful completion of a drug treatment program under this section may not, without the defendant’s consent, be used in any way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate.

Regardless of his or her successful completion of drug treatment, the arrest and conviction on which the
 probation was based may be recorded by the Department of Justice and disclosed in response to any peace officer application request or any law enforcement inquiry. Dismissal of an information, complaint, or indictment under this section does not relieve a defendant of the obligation to disclose the arrest and conviction in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for public office, for a position as a peace officer as defined in Section 830, for licensure by any state or local agency, for contracting with the California State Lottery, or for purposes of serving on a jury.

(f) (1) If probation is revoked pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision, the defendant may be incarcerated pursuant to otherwise applicable law without regard to the provisions of this section. The court may modify or revoke probation if the alleged violation is proved.

(2) If a defendant receives probation under subdivision (a), and violates that probation either by committing an offense that is not a nonviolent drug possession offense, or by violating a non-drug-related condition of probation, and the state moves to revoke probation, the court may remand the defendant for a period not exceeding 30 days during which time the court may receive input from treatment, probation, the state, and the defendant, and the court may conduct further hearings as it deems appropriate to determine whether or not probation should be reinstated under this section. If the court reinstates the defendant on probation, the court may modify the treatment plan and any other terms of probation, and continue the defendant in a treatment program under the Substance Abuse and Crime Prevention Act of 2000. If the court reinstates the defendant on probation, the court may, after receiving input from the treatment provider and probation, if
 available, intensify or alter the treatment plan under subdivision (a), and impose sanctions, including jail sanctions not exceeding 30 days, a tool to enhance treatment compliance.

(3) (A) If a defendant receives probation under subdivision (a), and violates that probation either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or a misdemeanor for simple possession or use of drugs or drug paraphernalia, being present where drugs are used, or failure to register as a drug offender, or any activity similar to those listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1210, or by violating a drug-related condition of probation, and the state moves to revoke probation, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether probation shall be revoked. The trial court shall revoke probation if the alleged probation violation is proved and the state proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant poses a danger to the safety of
 others. If the court does not revoke probation, it may intensify or alter the drug treatment plan and in addition, if the violation does not involve the recent use of drugs as a circumstance of the violation, including, but not limited to, violations relating to failure to appear at treatment or court, noncompliance with treatment, and failure to report for drug testing, the court may impose sanctions including jail sanctions that may not exceed 48 hours of continuous custody as a tool to enhance treatment compliance and impose other changes in the terms and conditions of probation. The court shall consider, among other factors, the seriousness of the violation, previous treatment compliance, employment, education, vocational training, medical conditions, medical treatment, including narcotics replacement treatment, and including the opinion of the defendant’s licensed and treating physician if immediately available and presented at the hearing, child support obligations, and family responsibilities. The
 court shall consider additional conditions of probation, which may include, but are not limited to, community service and supervised work programs. If one of the circumstances of the violation involves recent drug use, as well as other circumstances of violation, and the circumstance of recent drug use is demonstrated to the court by satisfactory evidence and a finding made on the record, the court may, after receiving input from treatment and probation, if available, direct the defendant to enter a licensed detoxification or residential treatment facility, and if there is no bed immediately available in that type of facility, the court may order that the defendant be confined in a county jail for detoxification purposes only, if the jail offers detoxification services, for a period not to exceed 10 days. The detoxification services must provide narcotic replacement therapy for those defendants presently actually receiving narcotic replacement therapy.

(B) If a defendant receives probation under subdivision (a), and for the second time violates that probation either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or a misdemeanor for simple possession or use of drugs or drug paraphernalia, being present where drugs are used, or failure to register as a drug offender, or any activity similar to those listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1210, or by violating a drug-related condition of probation, and the state moves to revoke probation, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether probation shall be revoked. The trial court shall revoke probation if the alleged probation violation is proved and the state proves by a preponderance of the evidence either that the defendant poses a danger to the safety of others or is unamenable to drug treatment. In determining whether a defendant is unamenable to drug treatment, the court may consider, to the extent relevant, whether the defendant (i) has committed a serious violation of rules at
 the drug treatment program, (ii) has repeatedly committed violations of program rules that inhibit the defendant’s ability to function in the program, or (iii) has continually refused to participate in the program or asked to be removed from the program. If the court does not revoke probation, it may intensify or alter the drug treatment plan, and may, in addition, if the violation does not involve the recent use of drugs as a circumstance of the violation, including, but not limited to, violations relating to failure to appear at treatment or court, noncompliance with treatment, and failure to report for drug testing, impose sanctions including jail sanctions that may not exceed 120 hours of continuous custody as a tool to enhance treatment compliance and impose other changes in the terms and conditions of probation. The court shall consider, among other factors, the seriousness of the violation, previous treatment compliance, employment, education, vocational training, medical conditions, medical
 treatment, including narcotics replacement treatment, and including the opinion of the defendant’s licensed and treating physician if immediately available and presented at the hearing, child support obligations, and family responsibilities. The court shall consider additional conditions of probation, which may include, but are not limited to, community service and supervised work programs. If one of the circumstances of the violation involves recent drug use, as well as other circumstances of violation, and the circumstance of recent drug use is demonstrated to the court by satisfactory evidence and a finding made on the record, the court may, after receiving input from treatment and probation, if available, direct the defendant to enter a licensed detoxification or residential treatment facility, and if there is no bed immediately available in the facility, the court may order that the defendant be confined in a county jail for detoxification purposes only, if the jail offers detoxification services, for a
 period not to exceed 10 days. Detoxification services must provide narcotic replacement therapy for those defendants presently actually receiving narcotic replacement therapy.

(C) If a defendant receives probation under subdivision (a), and for the third or subsequent time violates that probation either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or by violating a drug-related condition of probation, and the state moves for a third or subsequent time to revoke probation, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether probation shall be revoked. If the alleged probation violation is proved, the defendant is not eligible for continued probation under subdivision (a) unless the court determines that the defendant is not a danger to the community and would benefit from further treatment under subdivision (a). The court may then either intensify or alter the treatment plan under subdivision (a) or transfer the defendant to a highly
 structured drug court. If the court continues the defendant in treatment under subdivision (a), or drug court, the court may impose appropriate sanctions including jail sanctions as the court deems appropriate.

(D) If a defendant on probation at the effective date of this act for a nonviolent drug possession offense violates that probation either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or a misdemeanor for simple possession or use of drugs or drug paraphernalia, being present where drugs are used, or failure to register as a drug offender, or any activity similar to those listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1210, or by violating a drug-related condition of probation, and the state moves to revoke probation, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether probation shall be revoked. The trial court shall revoke probation if the alleged probation violation is proved and the state proves by a preponderance of the evidence that
 the defendant poses a danger to the safety of others. If the court does not revoke probation, it may modify or alter the treatment plan, and in addition, if the violation does not involve the recent use of drugs as a circumstance of the violation, including, but not limited to, violations relating to failure to appear at treatment or court, noncompliance with treatment, and failure to report for drug testing, the court may impose sanctions including jail sanctions that may not exceed 48 hours of continuous custody as a tool to enhance treatment compliance and impose other changes in the terms and conditions of probation. The court shall consider, among other factors, the seriousness of the violation, previous treatment compliance, employment, education, vocational training, medical conditions, medical treatment, including narcotics replacement treatment, and including the opinion of the defendant’s licensed and treating physician if immediately available and presented at the hearing, child support
 obligations, and family responsibilities. The court shall consider additional conditions of probation, which may include, but are not limited to, community service and supervised work programs. If one of the circumstances of the violation involves recent drug use, as well as other circumstances of violation, and the circumstance of recent drug use is demonstrated to the court by satisfactory evidence and a finding made on the record, the court may, after receiving input from treatment and probation, if available, direct the defendant to enter a licensed detoxification or residential treatment facility, and if there is no bed immediately available in that type of facility, the court may order that the defendant be confined in a county jail for detoxification purposes only, if the jail offers detoxification services, for a period not to exceed 10 days. The detoxification services must provide narcotic replacement therapy for those defendants presently actually receiving narcotic replacement therapy.

(E) If a defendant on probation at the effective date of this act for a nonviolent drug possession offense violates that probation a second time either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or a misdemeanor for simple possession or use of drugs or drug paraphernalia, being present where drugs are used, or failure to register as a drug offender, or any activity similar to those listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1210, or by violating a drug-related condition of probation, and the state moves for a second time to revoke probation, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether probation shall be revoked. The trial court shall revoke probation if the alleged probation violation is proved and the state proves by a preponderance of the evidence either that the defendant poses a danger to the safety of others or that the defendant is unamenable to drug treatment. If the court does not revoke probation, it may modify or alter the
 treatment plan, and in addition, if the violation does not involve the recent use of drugs as a circumstance of the violation, including, but not limited to, violations relating to failure to appear at treatment or court, noncompliance with treatment, and failure to report for drug testing, the court may impose sanctions including jail sanctions that may not exceed 120 hours of continuous custody as a tool to enhance treatment compliance and impose other changes in the terms and conditions of probation. The court shall consider, among other factors, the seriousness of the violation, previous treatment compliance, employment, education, vocational training, medical conditions, medical treatment including narcotics replacement treatment, and including the opinion of the defendant’s licensed and treating physician if immediately available and presented at the hearing, child support obligations, and family responsibilities. The court shall consider additional conditions of probation, which may include, but are
 not limited to, community service and supervised work programs. If one of the circumstances of the violation involves recent drug use, as well as other circumstances of violation, and the circumstance of recent drug use is demonstrated to the court by satisfactory evidence and a finding made on the record, the court may, after receiving input from treatment and probation, if available, direct the defendant to enter a licensed detoxification or residential treatment facility, and if there is no bed immediately available in that type of facility, the court may order that the defendant be confined in a county jail for detoxification purposes only, if the jail offers detoxification services, for a period not to exceed 10 days. The detoxification services must provide narcotic replacement therapy for those defendants presently actually receiving narcotic replacement therapy.

(F) If a defendant on probation at the effective date of this act for a
 nonviolent drug offense violates that probation a third or subsequent time either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or by violating a drug-related condition of probation, and the state moves for a third or subsequent time to revoke probation, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether probation shall be revoked. If the alleged probation violation is proved, the defendant is not eligible for continued probation under subdivision (a), unless the court determines that the defendant is not a danger to the community and would benefit from further treatment under subdivision (a). The court may then either intensify or alter the treatment plan under subdivision (a) or transfer the defendant to a highly structured drug court. If the court continues the defendant in treatment under subdivision (a), or drug court, the court may impose appropriate sanctions including jail sanctions.

(g) The term “drug-related condition of
 probation” shall include a probationer’s specific drug treatment regimen, employment, vocational training, educational programs, psychological counseling, and family counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 78.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.5.

In a case where a person has been ordered to undergo drug treatment as a condition of probation, any court ordered drug testing shall be used as a treatment tool. In evaluating a probationer’s treatment program, results of any drug testing shall be given no greater weight than any other aspects of the probationer’s individual treatment program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 721, Sec. 4.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.6.

(a) When the court considers a petition for relief under this chapter, in its discretion and in the interests of justice, an unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine shall not be grounds to deny relief under this chapter to a person whose probation was conditioned on making victim restitution, if the person otherwise qualifies for relief pursuant to this chapter.

(b) An unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine shall not be grounds for finding that a defendant did not fulfill the conditions of probation for the entire period of probation.

(c) An unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine shall not be grounds for finding that a defendant did not
 fully comply with, and perform the sentence of, the court or finding that a defendant has not lived an honest and upright life and has not conformed to and obeyed the laws of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 734, Sec. 9.   (SB 1106)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.4. Electronic Monitoring [1210.7. - 1210.16.]

1210.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a county probation department may utilize continuous electronic monitoring to electronically monitor the whereabouts of persons on probation, as provided by this chapter.

(b) Any use of continuous electronic monitoring pursuant to this chapter shall have as its primary objective the enhancement of public safety through the reduction in the number of people being victimized by crimes committed by persons on probation.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to specifically encourage a county probation department acting pursuant to this chapter to utilize a system of continuous electronic monitoring that conforms with the requirements of this chapter.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, “continuous electronic monitoring” may include the use of worldwide radio navigation system technology, known as the Global Positioning System, or GPS. The Legislature finds that because of its capability for continuous surveillance, continuous electronic monitoring has been used in other parts of the country to monitor persons on formal probation who are identified as requiring a high level of supervision.

(e) The Legislature finds that continuous electronic monitoring has proven to be an effective risk management tool for supervising high-risk persons on probation who are likely to reoffend where prevention and knowledge of their whereabouts is a high priority for maintaining public safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.8.

A county probation department may utilize a continuous electronic monitoring device pursuant to this section that has all of the following attributes:

(a) A device designed to be worn by a human being.

(b) A device that emits a signal as a person is moving or is stationary. The signal shall be capable of being received and tracked across large urban or rural areas, statewide, and being received from within structures, vehicles, and other objects to the degree technically feasible in light of the associated costs, design, and other considerations as are determined relevant by the county probation department.

(c) A device that functions 24 hours a day.

(d) A device that is resistant or impervious to unintentional or willful damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.9.

(a) A continuous electronic monitoring system may have the capacity to immediately notify a county probation department of violations, actual or suspected, of the terms of probation that have been identified by the monitoring system if the requirement is deemed necessary by the county probation officer with respect to an individual person.

(b) The information described in subdivision (a), including geographic location and tampering, may be used as evidence to prove a violation of the terms of probation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.10.

A county probation department shall establish the following standards as are necessary to enhance public safety:

(a) Standards for the minimum time interval between transmissions of information about the location of the person under supervision. The standards shall be established after an evaluation of, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The resources of the county probation department.

(2) The criminal history of the person under supervision.

(3) The safety of the victim of the persons under supervision.

(b) Standards for the accuracy of the information identifying the location of the person under supervision. The standards shall be established after consideration of, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The need to identify the location of a person proximate to the location of a crime, including a violation of probation.

(2) Resources of the probation department.

(3) The need to avoid false indications of proximity to crimes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.11.

(a) A county probation department operating a system of continuous electronic monitoring pursuant to this section shall establish prohibitions against unauthorized access to, and use of, information by private or public entities as may be deemed appropriate. Unauthorized access to, and use of, electronic signals includes signals transmitted in any fashion by equipment utilized for continuous electronic monitoring.

(b) Devices used pursuant to this section shall not be used to eavesdrop or record any conversation, except a conversation between the participant and the person supervising the participant that is to be used solely for the purposes of voice identification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.12.

(a) A county chief probation officer shall have the sole discretion, consistent with the terms and conditions of probation, to decide which persons shall be supervised using continuous electronic monitoring administered by the county probation department. No individual shall be required to participate in continuous electronic monitoring authorized by this chapter for any period of time longer than the term of probation.
